Wyoming, session 2025, HB0100.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 7-19-106(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlii), 7-19-201(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xxxvi), 21-3-111(a) by creating a new paragraph (xxiv),
HB0100

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0457
21-3-304 by creating a new subsection (s) and 21-7-303(a)
and by creating a new subsection (e) are amended to read:

7-19-106. Access to, and dissemination of,
information.

(a) Criminal history record information shall be
disseminated by criminal justice agencies in this state,
whether directly or through any intermediary, only to:

(xlii) School districts and charter schools to
obtain background information on applicants for employment
who do not hold a certificate or permit issued by the
Wyoming professional teaching standards board if the school
district board of trustees or the charter school governing
board has adopted policies and procedures authorizing
employment without certification or permit under W.S.
21-3-304(s) or 21-3-111(a)(xxiv).

7-19-201. State or national criminal history record
information.

HB0100

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0457
(a) The following persons shall be required to submit
to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national
criminal history record information:

(xxxvi) Applicants for employment by a school
district or a charter school who do not hold a certificate
or permit issued by the Wyoming professional teaching
standards board pursuant to W.S. 21-2-802 if the school
district board of trustees or the charter school governing
board has adopted policies and procedures authorizing
employment without certification or permit under W.S.
21-3-304(s) or 21-3-111(a)(xxiv).

21-3-111. Powers of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
within the state may:

(xxiv) Adopt policies and procedures to employ
school district administrators, teachers and other
personnel without a certification or permit issued by the
Wyoming professional teaching standards board pursuant to
W.S. 21-2-802. The policies and procedures adopted under
HB0100

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0457
this paragraph shall require a person applying for
employment without holding a certificate or permit to be
not less than eighteen (18) years of age and submit to a
criminal history background check.

21-3-304. Charter school; requirements; authority.

(s) A charter school governing board may adopt
policies and procedures to employ administrators, teachers
and other personnel without a certification or permit
issued by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-802. The policies and procedures
adopted under this subsection shall require a person
applying for employment without holding a certificate or
permit to be not less than eighteen (18) years of age and
submit to a criminal history background check.

21-7-303. Certificate or permit required; exception.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b),
(c), or (d) or (e) of this section, no person shall teach
or supervise in a public school in this state and receive
compensation therefor out of any public fund who at the
HB0100

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0457
time of rendering such services is not a holder of or a
candidate and qualified for a certificate or permit issued
or to be issued under the laws of this state and the rules
and regulations of the Wyoming professional teaching
standards board pursuant to W.S. 21-2-802.

(e) A person may be employed as an administrator,
teacher or other personnel by a school district or a
charter school without holding a certificate or permit
issued by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-802 if the school district board of
trustees or the charter school governing board has adopted
policies and procedures authorizing employment without
certification or permit under W.S. 21-3-304(s) or
21-3-111(a)(xxiv).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0100